Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.230

General penalty—Effect of conviction.

(1) A person who shall knowingly violate or knowingly aid or abet the violation of any provision of RCW 30B.10.050 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A director, officer, manager, employee, or agent of a state trust institution or affiliate who has had imposed upon him or her a criminal conviction for the violation of this title or any other financial services law of this or any other state or of the United States shall not be permitted to engage in or become or remain a board director, officer, manager, employee, or agent of any state trust company or its affiliate doing business in Washington state.

[ 2019 c 389 s 32.]